Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 5. Poultry and Poultry Products.

§ 69-7-201.
What constitutes “doing business”; resident agent; service of process.

For the purposes of this article, every person, firm, corporation, association or other legal entity who is engaged in hatching baby chicks and ratites, including baby ostrich, emu and rhea, for sale, distribution or under contract, either oral or written, for the production of ostrich, emu, rhea, broilers, laying hens, roosters or eggs, and every person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, who procures the production of ostrich, emu, rhea, broilers, laying hens, roosters or eggs for sale, distribution or processing by contract with others, either oral or written, shall be considered “doing business” within the State of Mississippi, and every person, firm, corporation, association or other legal entity that is a nonresident of this state and who desires to “do business” within this state as covered by this article shall, as a condition precedent to obtaining a license hereunder, appoint or designate a resident of the State of Mississippi as agent for the service of process and shall file such appointment or designation with the Secretary of State. Thereafter, the service of summons upon the agent appointed or designated shall be sufficient to give the courts of this state jurisdiction of any cause of action arising under the terms of this article. Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association or other legal entity who “does business” under the provisions of this article, whether under a license or otherwise, without appointing or designating an agent as herein required shall be deemed to have appointed the Secretary of State as such agent and may be proceeded against in courts of this state by service of process upon the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-81; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 417, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 543, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 69-7-203.
License required; fees; renewals.

Every person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or other legal entity in this state, engaged in the business of operating an incubator, or incubators, for hatching baby chicks and ratites, including baby ostrich, emu and rhea, for sale, distribution or under contract, either oral or written, for the production of ostrich, emu, rhea, broilers, laying hens, roosters or eggs for sale, distribution or processing by contract with others, either oral or written, is required to obtain a license to engage in such business from the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce of the State of Mississippi. The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall charge a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) for such license and a like fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) for the renewal thereof, which license must be renewed annually on or before July 1 of each succeeding year. The fees charged for the license shall be paid by the commissioner to the State Treasurer, who shall deposit the same in the General Fund in the State Treasury. Strict accounting of all fees charged hereunder shall be made by the commissioner.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to require any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, who may be engaged in the businesses covered by this article wholly for themselves, or any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, who purchases his own flocks and becomes wholly responsible for the growing and feeding thereof, to obtain a license hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-82; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 255, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 417, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 543, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 69-7-205.
Issuance and renewal or refusal of license.

The commissioner of agriculture and commerce is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to promulgate proper rules and regulations for the issuance of the license and for the renewal thereof, and for the preparation of the proper forms to be used, and the commissioner shall, to the best of his ability, inquire into the financial responsibility of every applicant for license and shall diligently endeavor to determine such applicants’ business reputation. Should the investigation made by the commissioner indicate insolvency of the applicant and such applicant is unable to establish the proof of his financial responsibility by furnishing proper credit references and financial statements, he may furnish to the commissioner copies of any contracts he may have with other allied and related businesses that would justify the commissioner in issuing the license. Otherwise, the commissioner shall not issue the license to any person who cannot reasonably establish his financial responsibility to carry out any contract he may propose to enter into.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-83; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 69-7-207.
Application for license.

The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall prescribe and furnish the necessary and proper forms for an application for a license required by Section 69-7-203, and such application form must be signed by the applicant, under oath, as to the correctness of the information furnished therein. Any applicant who shall knowingly furnish any false or fraudulent information for the purpose of obtaining a license hereunder, when such application has been duly and properly signed under oath, shall be guilty of perjury and subject to the penalties therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-84; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 69-7-209.
Appeal from refusal to grant license.

Any person feeling aggrieved with the decision of the commissioner of agriculture and commerce in refusing to grant a license hereunder shall have recourse by an appeal to the chancery court of Hinds County, Mississippi, by petition filed within thirty days from the date of final refusal to issue such license. The chancery court of Hinds County shall have and it is hereby given full jurisdiction of such appeal and it may enter any appropriate orders therein in term time or in vacation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-83; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 69-7-211.
Injunctions.

Should any person continue to operate such business without having complied with the provisions of this article, the commissioner of agriculture and commerce is authorized to file petition for an injunction in the chancery court of the district where the violator may reside, or in the district where the violation occurred. The chancery court shall have and it is hereby given full jurisdiction to hear and determine the petition and enter any and all appropriate orders in term time and in vacation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-85; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).

§ 69-7-213.
Penalties.

Any person who continues the operation of any of the businesses for which a license is required under the provisions of this article, without having complied with the provisions hereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4435-85; Laws, 1960, ch. 154, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1960).